Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2119
Death of licensee; representative may carry on business; how long; insurance required.

Upon the death of an electrical contractor, a Class A master electrician, a Class B electrical contractor, or a fire alarm installer, the board may permit his or her representative to carry on the business of the decedent for a period not to exceed six months for the purpose of completing work under contract to comply with the State Electrical Act. Such representative shall furnish all public liability and property damage insurance required by the board.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 20;

Laws 1978, LB 833, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 81-590;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 19;

Laws 2003, LB 126, § 12;

Laws 2024, LB144, § 11.
July 19, 2024